District of Columbia statutes.
47-2812

Public baths.

Owners or managers of establishments where public baths are supplied to transients shall pay a license fee of $152 per annum.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 624, ch. 1352, § 7, par. 12
July 1, 1932, 47 Stat. 552, ch. 366
Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title I, § 104(f), 23 DCR 2461
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Cross References

Mayor, Council and other offices, application of certain sections to boards, commissions and committees, see § 1-321.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2812.
1973 Ed., § 47-2312.